Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-105
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Uniform Credentialing Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 38-106 to 38-120.03 apply.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 5;

Laws 2017, LB88, § 29;

Laws 2018, LB701, § 2;

Laws 2019, LB112, § 2.